District of Columbia statutes.
1-613.51

Performance management system established.

There is established a comprehensive performance management system designed to:

(1)

Inform employees of work expectations;

(2)

Hold employees accountable for their performance, which shall include a direct relationship between the rating received pursuant to § 1-613.52 and the receipt of any periodic step increase or of any performance based increase that may be established under the compensation system authorized by subchapter XI;

(3)

Objectively evaluate employees’ work performance based on criteria that have been made known to the employees;

(4)

Improve employee performance through training;

(5)

Recognize employee accomplishment; and

(6)

Include customer satisfaction as an evaluation factor.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1351
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(p), 45 DCR 2464
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 103(q), 47 DCR 520
June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-131, § 2(a), 47 DCR 2692
1981 Ed., § 1-614.51.
D.C. Law 13-131 rewrote subd. (2), which previously read:
“Hold employees accountable for their performance, which shall include the requirement that an employee receive a rating of either ‘achieved expectations’ or ‘exceeded expectations’ pursuant to § 1-614.52 for the rating period immediately prior to the due date for a periodic step increase to be able to receive that step increase, and that each failure to achieve the required rating shall result in the due date for the step increase being delayed for an additional year;”.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Performance Rating Levels Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-85, April 12, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 2642).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Performance Rating Levels Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-206, December 8, 1999, 46 DCR 10468).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Performance Rating Levels Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-275, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2013).

Construction of Law 12-124

Section 301 of D.C. Law 12-124 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, approved August 5, 1997 (Public Law 105-33; 111 Stat. 712), except that § 47-395.04(b)(3) is expressly superseded. Further, nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of § 47-391.01 et seq. or of § 164 of the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1998, approved November 19, 1997 (Public Law 105-100; 111 Stat. 2160).

Delegation of Personnel Authority and Hiring of Employees Pursuant to the National Capital Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Reorganization Clarification Emergency Act of 2007, effective July 20,2007 (D.C. Act 17-71), see Mayor’s Order 2007-182, August 8, 2007 ( 54 DCR 11616).
Delegation of Personnel Authority and Hiring of Employees Pursuant to the National Capital Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Reorganization Clarification Emergency Act of 2007, D.C. Act 17-71, effective July 20, 2007, see Mayor’s Order 2007-195, August 24, 2007 ( 54 DCR 11633).

Applicability of § 101(p) of D.C. Law 12-124: Section 401(a) of D.C. Law 12-124, as amended by § 60 of D.C. Law 12-264, provided that § 101(d), (k), (p), (s), and (x) of this act shall apply upon the enactment of legislation by the United States Congress that states the following: “Notwithstanding any other law, section 101(d), (k), (p), (s), and (x) of the Omnibus Personnel Reform Act of 1998, adopted by the Council of the District of Columbia is enacted into law.”

Section 134 of Title I of Division C of Pub. L. 105-277, 112 Stat. 2681-596, provided that “Notwithstanding any other law, sections 101(d), (k), (p), (s), and (x) of the Omnibus Personnel Reform Amendment Act of 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, effective June 11, 1998, are enacted into law.”